Ohio, session 136, HB416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.448 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.448. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes 8
of United States route number six between state route number 9
fifty-eight and state route number fifty-seven, within the 10
municipal corporation of Lorain, in Lorain county, shall be 11
known as the "Police Officer Phillip Wagner Memorial Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13

H. B. No. 416 Page 2
As Introduced
along the highway indicating its name. 14